Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.010

Purpose.

The health sciences and services program is created to promote bioscience-based economic development and advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease and promote public health.

[ 2007 c 251 s 2.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2007 c 251: "Captions used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2007 c 251 s 14.]

Severability—2007 c 251: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2007 c 251 s 15.]